Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-503
Department of Health and Human Services; duty to cooperate with other agencies.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall cooperate and coordinate its child and maternal welfare activities with those of state institutions, the vocational rehabilitation division of the State Department of Education, courts, county boards, charities and all other organizations, societies and agencies, state and national, to promote child welfare and health.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 30, § 3, p. 180;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-503;

R.S.1943, § 43-503;

Laws 1969, c. 342, § 2, p. 1204;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 151.